Ohio, session 136, HB576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.21 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 5.21. The first Monday in September of each year shall be known as "Labor day" and for all purposes shall be considered as the first day of the week. The second Monday in October of each year shall be known as "Columbus day" and is a legal holiday. The eleventh day of November of each year shall be known as "Veterans' day" and is a legal holiday. If said day falls on Sunday, the following Monday is the legal holiday. The month of November of each year shall be designated as "Veterans' month" to encourage the observance of events recognizing the contributions of Ohio veterans. Section 2. That existing section 5.21 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.